Washington statutes.
RCW 38.32.080

Penalty for failure to obey call.

Any member of the militia who shall have been ordered out for either state or federal service and who shall refuse or wilfully or negligently fail to report at the time and place and to the officer designated in the order or to the representative or successor of such officer, shall be deemed guilty of desertion, and shall suffer such penalty as a general court martial may direct, unless he or she shall produce a sworn certificate from a licensed physician of good standing that he or she was physically unable to appear at the time and place designated. Any person chargeable with desertion under this section may be taken by force and compelled to serve.

[ 1989 c 19 s 42; 1943 c 130 s 10; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-10. Prior: 1917 c 107 s 10; 1909 c 134 s 21; 1895 c 108 s 114.]